Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2731
Payment to minor.

If a financial institution is required or permitted to make payment pursuant to sections 30-2716 to 30-2733 to a minor designated as a beneficiary, payment may be made pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act or pursuant to any other laws of this state.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 17.

Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, see section 43-2701.